cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.aff
SFX H   nąć       łaś       [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ć         ł         [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       ł         [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęła       [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       ła        [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęło       [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       ło        [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęliśmy    [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       liśmy     [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęłyśmy    [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       łyśmy     [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęliście   [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       liście    [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęłyście   [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       łyście    [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęli       [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       li        [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęły       [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       ły        [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ć         łbym      [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       łbym      [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęłabym    [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       łabym     [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ć         łbyś      [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       łbyś      [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęłabyś    [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       łabyś     [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ć         łby       [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       łby       [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęłaby     [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       łaby      [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęłoby     [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       łoby      [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęliby     [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       liby      [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęłyby     [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       łyby      [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęlibyście [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       libyście  [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęłybyście [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       łybyście  [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęlibyśmy  [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       libyśmy   [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ąć        ęłybyśmy  [^n]ąć
SFX H   nąć       łybyśmy   [^aąeęioóu]znąć
SFX H   ść        dłem      aść
SFX H   ść        dłam      aść
SFX H   ść        dłeś      aść
SFX H   ść        dłaś      aść
SFX H   ść        dł        aść
SFX H   ść        dła       aść
SFX H   ść        dło       aść
SFX H   ść        dliśmy    aść
SFX H   ść        dłyśmy    aść
SFX H   ść        dliście   aść
SFX H   ść        dłyście   aść
SFX H   ść        dli       aść
SFX H   ść        dły       aść
SFX H   ść        dłbym     aść
SFX H   ść        dłabym    aść
SFX H   ść        dłbyś     aść
SFX H   ść        dłabyś    aść
SFX H   ść        dłby      aść
SFX H   ść        dłaby     aść
SFX H   ść        dłoby     aść
SFX H   ść        dliby     aść
SFX H   ść        dłyby     aść
SFX H   ść        dlibyście aść
SFX H   ść        dłybyście aść
SFX H   ść        dlibyśmy  aść
SFX H   ść        dłybyśmy  aść
SFX H   ąść       adłem     [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłam     [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłeś     [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłaś     [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adł       [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adła      [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adło      [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       edliśmy   [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłyśmy   [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       edliście  [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłyście  [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       edli      [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adły      [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłbym    [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłabym   [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłbyś    [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłabyś   [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłby     [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłaby    [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłoby    [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       edliby    [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłyby    [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       edlibyście [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłybyście [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       edlibyśmy [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       adłybyśmy [^z]ąść
SFX H   ąść       ądłem     ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędłam     ząść
SFX H   ąść       ądłeś     ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędłaś     ząść
SFX H   ąść       ądł       ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędła      ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędło      ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędliśmy   ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędłyśmy   ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędliście  ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędłyście  ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędli      ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędły      ząść
SFX H   ąść       ądłbym    ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędłabym   ząść
SFX H   ąść       ądłbyś    ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędłabyś   ząść
SFX H   ąść       ądłby     ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędłaby    ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędłoby    ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędliby    ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędłyby    ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędlibyście ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędłybyście ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędlibyśmy ząść
SFX H   ąść       ędłybyśmy ząść
SFX H   eść       odłem     [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odłam     [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odłeś     [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odłaś     [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       ódł       [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odła      [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odło      [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       edliśmy   [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odłyśmy   [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       edliście  [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odłyście  [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       edli      [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odły      [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       ódłbym    [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odłabym   [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       ódłbyś    [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odłabyś   [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       ódłby     [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odłaby    [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odłoby    [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       edliby    [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odłyby    [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       edlibyście [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odłybyście [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       edlibyśmy [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       odłybyśmy [^mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłem     [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłam     [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłeś     [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłaś     [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       ósł       [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osła      [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osło      [mn]ieść
SFX H   ść        śliśmy    [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłyśmy   [mn]ieść
SFX H   ść        śliście   [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłyście  [mn]ieść
SFX H   ść        śli       [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osły      [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       ósłbym    [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłabym   [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       ósłbyś    [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłabyś   [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       ósłby     [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłaby    [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłoby    [mn]ieść
SFX H   ść        śliby     [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłyby    [mn]ieść
SFX H   ść        ślibyście [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłybyście [mn]ieść
SFX H   ść        ślibyśmy  [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       osłybyśmy [mn]ieść
SFX H   eść       adłem     jeść
SFX H   eść       adłam     jeść
SFX H   eść       adłeś     jeść
SFX H   eść       adłaś     jeść
SFX H   eść       adł       jeść
SFX H   eść       adła      jeść
SFX H   eść       adło      jeść
SFX H   ść        dliśmy    jeść
SFX H   eść       adłyśmy   jeść
SFX H   ść        dliście   jeść
SFX H   eść       adłyście  jeść
SFX H   ść        dli       jeść
SFX H   eść       adły      jeść
SFX H   eść       adłbym    jeść
SFX H   eść       adłabym   jeść
SFX H   eść       adłbyś    jeść
SFX H   eść       adłabyś   jeść
SFX H   eść       adłby     jeść
SFX H   eść       adłaby    jeść
SFX H   eść       adłoby    jeść
SFX H   ść        dliby     jeść
SFX H   eść       adłyby    jeść
SFX H   ść        dlibyście jeść
SFX H   eść       adłybyście jeść
SFX H   ść        dlibyśmy  jeść
SFX H   eść       adłybyśmy jeść
SFX H   eść       otłem     leść
SFX H   eść       otłam     leść
SFX H   eść       otłeś     leść
SFX H   eść       otłaś     leść
SFX H   eść       ótł       leść
SFX H   eść       otła      leść
SFX H   eść       otło      leść
SFX H   ść        śliśmy    leść
SFX H   eść       otłyśmy   leść
SFX H   ść        śliście   leść
SFX H   eść       otłyście  leść
SFX H   ść        śli       leść
SFX H   eść       otły      leść
SFX H   eść       ótłbym    leść
SFX H   eść       otłabym   leść
SFX H   eść       ótłbyś    leść
SFX H   eść       otłabyś   leść
SFX H   eść       ótłby     leść
SFX H   eść       otłaby    leść
SFX H   eść       otłoby    leść
SFX H   ść        śliby     leść
SFX H   eść       otłyby    leść
SFX H   ść        ślibyście leść
