cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.dic
akwirować/BEGHJej
antyszambrować/BGHJej
awansować/BEGHJej
batożyć/EHIdikv
biosterować/BEGHJdi
bolszewizować/BEGHJej
brylować/BGHJej
całościować/BEGHJej
chichotać/BGHJej
chudnąć/BHIejv
cochać/EHIdikv
czerstwieć/BHIejv
dążyć/HIdikv
deklamować/BEGHJej
denazyfikować/BEGHJej
detalizować/BEGHJej
dobarwić/BEHIdik
dodać/EHdhik
dogryźć/BEHJej
dokopywać/BEGHJej
doładować/BEHJej
donieść/BEHJej
dopływać/HIdikv
dorównywać/BEGHIJdikv
dostawić/EHIdik
dośnieżać/EHIdikv
dotyczyć/HIdikv
dożeglowywać/BGHJej
dulić/EHIdikv
dysymulować/BEGHJej
ekranizować/BEGHJej
emulować/BEGHJej
fakturować/BEGHJej
finiszować/BGHJej
fotomontować/BEGHJej
gamifikować/BEGHJej
gliwieć/BHIejv
graniczyć/HIdikv
gwarantować/BEGHJej
hermetyzować/BEGHJej
ignorować/BEGHJej
inseminować/BEGHJej
jakościować/BEGHJej
kajakować/BGHJej
karesować/BEGHJej
kielować/BEGHJej
klonować/BEGHJej
kolorować/BEGHJej
konotować/BEGHJej
koprodukować/BEGHJej
krechtać/HIdikv
ksykać/HIdikv
lecieć/GHJejk
łoić/EHIdikv
meandrować/BGHJej
młynarzować/BGHJej
nabłyszczyć/EHIdik
nadczerpywać/BEGHJej
nadstawić/EHIdik
nagryźć/BEHJej
nalepić/EHIdik
napalić/EHIdik
naprzyrzekać/EHIdik
nasmażyć/EHIdik
naśnieżać/EHIdikv
nawitaminować/BEHJei
nażyć/BHJej
obczepiać/EHIdikv
oblać/BEHJej
obrąbać/BEHJej
obszczywać/EHIdikv
ochlustać/BEHIdik
odbyć/BEHIej
odessać/BEHJej
odkapslowywać/BEGHJej
odługowywać/BEGHJej
odpersonalizowywać/BEGHJej
odpyskować/BHJej
odsprzedać/EHdhik
odtłuc/BEHJej
odzwyczaić/EHIdik
okleinować/BEGHJej
omodlić/EHIdik
opłakać/BEHJej
osiąknąć/BFHIej
oszczędzić/EHIdik
owiać/BEHJej
partnerować/BGHJej
pięknieć/BHIejv
pobaraszkować/BHJej
pochlastać/BEHIdik
podbrudzać/EHIdikv
podhaczać/EHIdikv
podmarzać/HIdikv
podpierniczyć/EHIdik
podsmalić/EHIdik
podwyższyć/BEHIdik
pogniewać/EHIdik
pokarać/BEHJej
pokrócić/EHIdik
połgać/BEHIJdik
pomyć/BEHJej
ponominować/BEHJej
poodpinać/EHIdik
popasać/EHIdikv
popracować/BHJej
poprzycinać/EHIdik
porozgałęziać/EHIejk
poryzować/BEHJej
pospierać/EHIdik
poszeptywać/BEGHJej
potopić/EHIdik
pousychać/EHIdik
powodować/BEGHJej
powykłuwać/EHIdik
powysiadać/HIdik
pozadymiać/EHIdik
pozasadzać/EHIdik
pozłorzeczyć/HIdik
pracować/BGHJej
przebalastować/BEHJej
przeczołgać/EHIdik
przefruwać/EHIdikv
przekarmić/EHIdik
przelatać/EHIdik
przemyć/BEHJej
przepracować/BEHJej
przesłodzić/BEHIdik
prześmigiwać/BEGHJej
przewertować/BEHJej
przychrzaniać/EHIdikv
przygruchiwać/BEGHJej
przymaszerowywać/BGHJej
przyporządkować/BEHJej
przysznurowywać/BEGHJei
przywrócić/EHIdik
reagować/BGHJej
reprywatyzować/BEGHJej
rozbolewać/HIdikv
rozdrażnić/BEHIdik
rozgryźć/BEHJej
rozkrawać/EHIdikv
rozmienić/EHIdik
rozpisywać/BEGHJej
rozregulowywać/BEGHJej
rozsznurowywać/BEGHJej
rozwielmożnić/BHIdi
sadzonkować/BEGHJej
schlapać/BEHIej
sfeminizować/BEHJej
skarlać/EHIdikv
skoncentrować/BEHJej
skrzywdzić/EHIdik
spalać/EHIdikv
spilśniać/EHIdikv
spotworzyć/BEHIdi
spustoszeć/BHIdi
stosować/BEGHJej
suplikować/BEGHJej
szmyrgać/EHIdikv
śmiechać/HIdik
terować/BEGHJej
tryfić/HIdikv
ubóstwić/BEHIdi
udostępniać/EHIdikv
ujarzmiać/EHIdikv
ulatniać/HIdikv
umuzykalnić/BEHIdi
upiec/BEHIej
uprzymiotnikowić/BEHIdik
uskromnić/BEHIdi
uszorować/BEHJej
uwadniać/EHIdikv
uzłośliwiać/EHIdikv
wczasować/BGHJej
wielbić/BEHIdikv
włamywać/BEGHJej
wpółklęczeć/HJdikv
współistnieć/BHIejv
wtentegować/BEHJei
wybrać/BEHJej
wyciszać/EHIdikv
wydrążyć/EHIdik
wygiąć/BEHJej
wyjednać/EHIdik
wykoszlawić/EHIdik
wylinić/HIdik
wymiętosić/EHIdik
wyosabniać/EHIdikv
wypluwać/EHIdikv
wypudrować/BEHJej
wysępić/EHIdik
wystopować/BEHJej
wyszydzać/EHIdikv
wytrwać/HIdik
wyzerowywać/BEGHJej
zaakcentować/BEHJej
zabrząkać/EHIdik
zacietrzewić/HIdik
zadrzewiać/EHIdikv
zagłuszyć/EHIdik
zaintubować/BEHJej
zakodować/BEHJej
zakwitnąć/BFHIej
zamęczyć/EHIdik
zaoblić/BEHIdik
zapisać/BEHJej
zaprzysięgać/EHIdikv
zasiać/BEHJej
zastymulować/BEHJej
zaświdrować/BEHJej
zawahać/HIdik
zażartować/BHJej
zbrylić/HIdik
zdepolonizować/BEHJej
zdziecinnieć/BHIej
zesuwać/EHIdikv
zgłośnić/BEHIdi
zimitować/BEHJej
złajać/BEHJej
zmierzyć/EHIdik
zniekształcać/EHIdikv
zrefinansować/BEHJej
zrypać/BEHIej
zwąchać/EHIdik
zżuwać/EHIdikv
